Illinois, session 104th, HB2757.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Chicago Downtown Revitalization Task Force Act. 6    Section 5. Findings. The General Assembly finds:7        (1) Downtown Chicago, encompassing the City of 8    Chicago's Central Business District and its associated 9    neighborhoods, is one of the most critical economic 10    engines of the State of Illinois, contributing hundreds of 11    millions of dollars in State and local tax revenue and 12    billions of dollars of economic activity to the State's 13    economy.14        (2) Like large urban cores throughout the country, 15    downtown Chicago faces critical challenges coming out of 16    the COVID-19 pandemic as people continue to make different 17    decisions about how and where they live, work, and play.18        (3) These decisions create cascading effects that 19    manifest broad implications for public policy decisions. 20    As downtown commercial office occupancy rates hover below 21    50% of pre-pandemic levels and the overall vacancy rate is 22    at a historic high of nearly 20%, with more than 8,000,000 23    additional square feet of sublease availability, the   HB2757 Engrossed- 2 -LRB104 09433 RTM 19493 b1    resulting reductions in workers and foot traffic put 2    downward pressure on office rents, lower commercial office 3    building values, jeopardize the viability of restaurant 4    and retail establishments, and shift a larger property tax 5    burden onto homeowners across the city.6        (4) Post-pandemic changes in behavior also create 7    economic opportunities, such as an increased interest in 8    unique or exceptional leisure experiences, opportunities 9    to further grow the residential population of downtown 10    Chicago, or new and innovative programs and initiatives to 11    attract tenants and the workforce to downtown Chicago.12        (5) Policymakers at every level of government will be 13    required to assess all of these concurrent pressures and 14    determine how existing and future taxation, development, 15    and other policy solutions encourage a vibrant and 16    thriving downtown economy that is responsive to this new 17    post-pandemic reality both today and in the years to come. 18    Section 10. Chicago Downtown Revitalization Task Force.19    (a) The Chicago Downtown Revitalization Task Force is 20established.21    (b) The Task Force consists of the following members:22        (1) four members appointed one each by the Speaker of 23    the House of Representatives, the Minority Leader of the 24    House of Representatives, the President of the Senate, and 25    the Minority Leader of the Senate;  HB2757 Engrossed- 3 -LRB104 09433 RTM 19493 b1        (2) the Director of Commerce and Economic Opportunity 2    or the Director's designee, who shall serve as an ex 3    officio, nonvoting, advisory member;4        (3) the Director of Revenue or the Director's 5    designee;6        (4) the Mayor of the City of Chicago or the Mayor's 7    designee;8        (5) a member of the City Council of the City of Chicago 9    appointed by the Governor;10        (6) a representative of an association that represents 11    Chicago's downtown commercial real estate and office 12    industry, appointed by the Governor;13        (7) a representative of an association that represents 14    the restaurant industry, appointed by the Governor;15        (8) a representative of an association that represents 16    the retail industry, appointed by the Governor;17        (9) a representative of an association that represents 18    Chicago's downtown residential property owners, appointed 19    by the Governor;20        (10) a representative of an association that 21    represents the hotel industry, appointed by the Governor;22        (11) a representative of a downtown cultural 23    institution, appointed by the Governor;24        (12) two representatives that represent additional 25    business interests in downtown Chicago, appointed by the 26    Governor;  HB2757 Engrossed- 4 -LRB104 09433 RTM 19493 b1        (13) two experts on tax policy, including property 2    taxes, appointed by the Governor; and3        (14) two representatives of labor unions or 4    associations of labor unions, appointed by the Governor.5    (c) Initial appointments to the Task Force shall be made 6as soon as practicable after the effective date of this Act. 7The Task Force shall hold its first meeting within a 8reasonable period of time after the completion of the 9appointment of its members and shall convene regularly to 10carry out its duties and submit the reports required under 11this Act. At its first meeting, the Task Force shall elect its 12chair and any other officers from among its members.13    (d) Members of the Task Force shall serve without 14compensation.15    (e) Subject to appropriation, the Department of Commerce 16and Economic Opportunity shall provide administrative and 17other support to the Task Force. Each agency and entity 18represented on the Task Force shall also share with the Task 19Force any data of the agency or entity necessary for the Task 20Force to carry out its duties under this Act. 21    Section 15. Task Force duties.22    (a) The Task Force has the following duties:23        (1) to conduct an analysis of all taxes and economic 24    incentives, monetary or otherwise, that impact downtown 25    Chicago, which shall include all taxes and incentives   HB2757 Engrossed- 5 -LRB104 09433 RTM 19493 b1    levied or administered directly by the State of Illinois, 2    as well as those authorized by State law but implemented 3    by units of local government, including the City of 4    Chicago;5        (2) to research and review trends impacting downtown 6    Chicago, including, but not limited to, population growth, 7    office occupancy rates, commercial office vacancy and 8    valuation figures, retail sales, restaurant sales, hotel 9    occupancy rates, and cultural event attendance;10        (3) to examine national best practices in the area of 11    post-pandemic revitalization of large urban centers and to 12    consider the applicability of such policies to downtown 13    Chicago; 14        (4) to assess existing and potential industry clusters 15    based on current and anticipated trends and to consider 16    policy solutions that may optimize the marketability and 17    overall appeal of downtown Chicago to potential growth 18    sectors; and19        (5) to make recommendations regarding changes to 20    existing policy or the implementation of new policies to 21    enhance economic activity in and increase the overall 22    vitality of downtown Chicago. 23    Section 20. Reports.24    (a) The Task Force shall submit a report to the Governor 25and the General Assembly no later than 12 months after the   HB2757 Engrossed- 6 -LRB104 09433 RTM 19493 b1effective date of this Act, detailing the findings and any 2actions taken to further the duties of the Task Force and 3describing any planned efforts and activities.4    (b) Periodically, after the submission of the initial 5report under subsection (a), the Task Force shall submit 6reports to the Governor and the General Assembly providing 7updates of the findings and actions taken to further the 8duties of the Task Force. The reports required under this 9subsection shall continue for the duration of the Task Force. 10    Section 25. Termination of Task Force; repeal.11    (a) The Task Force is dissolved 5 years after the 12effective date of this Act.13    (b) This Act is repealed on January 1, 2032.